Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 2 General Powers of Banks and Trust Companies

7-1-260.
General corporate powers.

Subject to restrictions contained in this chapter or in its articles, a bank or trust company shall have the power:

To have perpetual duration unless a limited period of duration is stated in its articles. Each bank or trust company existing on April 1, 1975, shall have perpetual duration unless its articles are amended under this chapter to provide for a limited period of duration;

To sue and be sued, complain and defend in its corporate name;

To have a corporate seal, which may be altered at pleasure, and to use the same by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or in any manner reproduced;

To adopt, alter, and repeal bylaws pursuant to the procedures of Code Section 7-1-481 containing provisions for the regulation and management of affairs of the institution not inconsistent with law or its articles;

To elect or appoint and remove officers and agents of the institution and to define their duties and fix their compensation;

To make contracts;

To make, irrespective of corporate benefit, loans, investments, contributions, and donations for community development and the promotion of the public welfare or for other religious, charitable, scientific, educational, hospital, civic, or similar purposes and in time of war or other national emergency in aid of the national effort with respect thereto;

At the request or direction of the United States government or any public body thereof, to transact lawful business in time of war or national emergency in aid of the national effort in connection therewith;

To procure, for its benefit, insurance on the life of any of its directors, officers, or employees or any other person whose death might cause financial loss to the bank or trust company; or, pursuant to any contract lawfully obligating the bank or trust company as guarantor or surety, on the life of the principal obligor; and

To reimburse and indemnify litigation, liabilities, and expenses of directors, officers, and employees pursuant to agreements with them or otherwise and to purchase and maintain liability insurance for their benefit unless otherwise limited pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2817; Ga. L. 1917, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1920, p. 76, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-1801, 109-201; Code 1933, § 41A-1201, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 946, § 67; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 11.

Editor’s notes.

The amendment to this Code section by Ga. L. 1989, p. 946, § 67, was superseded by the amendment by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 3, which was enacted later.

7-1-261.
Additional operational powers.

Banks and trust companies shall, in addition, have the power:

To act as agent of the United States or any public body thereof for the sale or issue of bonds, notes, or other obligations of the United States, or those for which the full faith and credit of the United States is pledged, and to grant security interests in its assets for the faithful performance of its duties as agent;

To receive for safekeeping or to rent out receptacles or safe-deposit boxes for the deposit of papers and other personal property;

To grant security interests in their assets for borrowings authorized by this chapter and to dispose of their assets in the same manner as corporations generally;

To give bond in any proceeding in any court in which they are a party or upon any appeal in any such proceeding and to secure such bond;

To acquire and hold real property to the extent permitted by Code Sections 7-1-262, 7-1-282, and 7-1-286;

To acquire and hold stocks and investment securities subject, in the case of banks, to the restrictions of Code Sections 7-1-287 and 7-1-288 and, in the case of trust institutions, to the restrictions of Code Section 7-1-312;

To acquire and hold personal property necessary in the exercise of powers conferred by this chapter;

To acquire and hold any property in order to avoid loss on an evidence of indebtedness, agreement for the payment of money, or an investment security previously acquired lawfully and in good faith subject to the restrictions of Code Section 7-1-263;

To hold property lawfully held on April 1, 1975, irrespective of any restriction or limitation in this chapter, subject to the inclusion of any such property in any computation of limitation on the acquisition of property of like character under this chapter;

To enter into an agency relationship as defined in Code Section 7-1-4 subject to restrictions and qualifications prescribed by regulations of the department; and

To have and exercise all powers necessary, convenient, or incidental to effect any and all purposes for which the bank or trust company and its subsidiaries and affiliates is organized, provided that the commissioner may establish approval procedures by regulation for additional powers as needed to satisfy the objectives of this chapter. Powers shall include but not be limited to: sale of securities, annuities, and other investment products upon the order of and for the account of its customers, subject to applicable federal or state securities requirements; sale of insurance subject to state insurance laws, regulations, and licensing requirements, applicable federal laws, and departmental regulations and policies; sale or lease of excess computer capacity; expansion of customer services through the use of technology; other powers including those bank and trust powers authorized to subsidiaries of the bank or trust company pursuant to subparagraph (c)(2)(F) of Code Section 7-1-288; and other such powers to carry on banking, trust, or other activities determined by the commissioner to be financial in nature or incident or complementary to such financial activities and consistent with the objectives of this chapter and the regulations of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2817; Ga. L. 1917, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1920, p. 76, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-1801, 109-201; Code 1933, § 13-1802, enacted by Ga. L. 1968, p. 1044, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1202, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1249, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 11; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 4.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, commas were deleted preceding and following “and its subsidiaries and affiliates” in the first sentence in paragraph (11).

Law reviews.

For survey article on insurance, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 177 (1982).

7-1-262.
Power to hold real estate; prior approval of acquisitions.

A bank or trust company may solely or jointly with other persons or corporations acquire and hold such real property as it:

Occupies or intends to occupy primarily for the transaction of its business, the business of any subsidiary or affiliate, or the recreational use of its employees or partly so occupies and partly leases;

Acquires for the purpose of providing parking or other facilities primarily for the use of its tenants, customers, officers, and employees; or

Acquires with others for the purpose of providing data processing facilities or other support services for the bank or trust company or any subsidiary solely or in cooperation with others,

subject to the limitation that the investment of the bank or trust company in all such real property, in all furniture, fixtures, and equipment acquired in connection with any real property owned or leased by the bank or trust company, in all alterations of buildings on real property owned or leased by the bank or trust company, in all shares of corporations organized for the purpose of holding real estate in the categories described above where the bank or trust company or a subsidiary of the bank or trust company owns 25 percent or more of such shares outstanding, in obligations of or for the benefit of such corporations or loans upon the security of the shares of such corporations or, to the extent of the bank’s or trust company’s pro rata interest, the security of the real estate itself, and in all real estate, furniture, fixtures, or equipment held beyond the limits specified in Code Section 7-1-263 shall not exceed 60 percent of the statutory capital base of the bank or trust company, or such larger amount as may be approved by the department.

All acquisitions of real property for purposes authorized above must be accorded prior written approval by the department in advance of the acquisition except to the extent authorized by regulation.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2817; Ga. L. 1917, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 24; Ga. L. 1920, p. 76, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-2024, 109-201; Ga. L. 1963, p. 512, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1242, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1203, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 16; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1249, § 3.

7-1-263.
Property held to avoid loss.

A bank or trust company may acquire and hold property for the purpose of avoiding loss as specified in paragraph (8) of Code Section 7-1-261, subject to:

A determination by a majority vote of its directors at least once each year as to the advisability of retaining any such property, provided that no such property may be held for more than five years without the prior written approval of the department; and

Disposition within a period of six months after the date of acquisition or such longer period as the department may approve in writing of shares of its own stock so acquired and of shares of stock of any bank, bank holding company, or trust company held after such acquisition.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2817; Ga. L. 1917, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, §§ 22-24; Ga. L. 1920, p. 76, § 1; Ga. L. 1924, p. 76, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 10; Code 1933, §§ 13-2022, 13-2023, 13-2024, 109-201; Ga. L. 1946, p. 65, § 1; Ga. L. 1947, p. 501, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 18, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 284, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 275, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 238, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 512, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 523, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 8; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1162, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 976, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1242, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1204, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 6.